Missouri, session 2026, HB3328.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 33.080, 325.055, and 375.991, RSMo, are repealed and thirty-one
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 33.080, 325.052, 325.055,
375.991, 379.135, 379.162, 379.163, 379.3000, 379.3005, 379.3010, 379.3015, 379.3020,
379.3025, 379.3030, 379.3035, 379.3040, 379.3042, 379.3045, 379.3050, 379.3055,
379.3100, 379.3105, 379.3110, 379.3115, 379.3120, 379.3125, 379.3130, 379.3135,
379.3140, 380.661, and 380.671, to read as follows:
33.080. 1. All fees, funds and moneys from whatsoever source received by any
department, board, bureau, commission, institution, official or agency of the state government
by virtue of any law or rule or regulation made in accordance with any law, excluding all
funds received and disbursed by the state on behalf of counties and cities, towns and villages
shall, by the official authorized to receive same, and at stated intervals of not more than thirty
days, be placed in the state treasury to the credit of the particular purpose or fund for which
collected, and shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly for the particular
purpose or fund for which collected during the biennium in which collected and appropriated.
The unexpended balance remaining in all such funds (except such unexpended balance as
may remain in any fund authorized, collected and expended by virtue of the provisions of the
constitution of this state) shall at the end of the biennium and after all warrants on same have
been discharged and the appropriation thereof has lapsed, be transferred and placed to the
credit of the general revenue fund of the state by the state treasurer. Any official or any
person who shall willfully fail to comply with any of the provisions of this section, and any
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3328 2
person who shall willfully violate any provision hereof, shall be deemed guilty of a
misdemeanor; provided, that all such money received by the curators of the University of
Missouri except those funds required by law or by instrument granting the same to be paid
into the seminary fund of the state, is excepted herefrom, and in the case of other state
educational institutions there is excepted herefrom, gifts or trust funds from whatever source;
appropriations; gifts or grants from the federal government, private organizations and
individuals; funds for or from student activities; farm or housing activities; and other funds
from which the whole or some part thereof may be liable to be repaid to the person
contributing the same; and hospital fees. All of the above excepted funds shall be reported in
detail quarterly to the governor and biennially to the general assembly.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary concerning the transfer of
funds, [ten] twelve million dollars shall be transferred from the insurance dedicated fund
established under section 374.150, and placed to the credit of the [rebuild damaged
infrastructure] Missouri's stronger homesfund created in section [33.295] 379.3115on [July
1, 2013] July 1, 2027, and amounts as specified under section 379.3115 on an annual
basis commencing July 1, 2028, and ending on July 30, 2037.
325.052. 1. Except as otherwise specified in this section, a public adjuster may
receive a commission for services provided under this chapter consisting of an hourly
fee, a flat fee, or a reasonable percentage of the amount paid by an insurer to resolve a
claim.
2. A public adjuster shall not receive a fee or commission based on a percentage
of the total amount paid by an insurer to settle a claim if, within ten days of reporting
the loss, the insurer either pays or commits in writing to pay the insured the policy
limits.
3. A public adjuster shall not accept any payment or compensation that violates
the provisions of this section.
4. A public adjuster is entitled to reasonable compensation from the insured for
services provided by a public adjuster on behalf of the insured, based on the actual time
spent on a claim that is subject to this section and expenses incurred by a public
adjuster, until the claim is paid or the insured receives a written commitment to pay
from the insurer.
5. Notwithstanding any authorization, contract, or agreement the insured may
have given to a public adjuster, a public adjuster shall not sign or endorse any payment
draft or check on behalf of an insured.
6. Notwithstanding any authorization, contract, or agreement the insured may
have given to a public adjuster, a public adjuster shall not represent himself or herself in

HCS HB 3328 3
any communication as the insured. All communications from a public adjuster shall
clearly identify himself or herself as a public adjuster.
7. All contracts with a public adjuster shall include the following disclaimer,
placed immediately above the signature of the insured, in a bold, twelve-point font:
"YOU DON'T HAVE TO HIRE A PUBLIC ADJUSTER TO FILE A
CLAIM WITH YOUR INSURANCE COMPANY. IF YOU HIRE A
PUBLIC ADJUSTER, YOU WILL HAVE TO PAY ALL THE
COSTS. THAT WILL REDUCE THE AMOUNT OF MONEY YOU
GET FROM THE INSURANCE COMPANY TO REPAIR OR
REBUILD YOUR HOME OR REPLACE YOUR BELONGINGS.
IF YOU NEED HELP WITH YOUR CLAIM, THE MISSOURI
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE AND INSURANCE WILL HELP
YOU FOR FREE. YOU CAN CALL THE DEPARTMENT AT 800-
726-7390 OR FILE A COMPLAINT ONLINE AT
INSURANCE.MO.GOV/CONSUMERS.".
8. Any violation of subsections 1 to 7 of this section is a level two violation under
section 374.049.
325.055. 1. No person, partnership, association or corporation, directly or indirectly,
acting as a public adjuster or public adjuster solicitor licensed under the provisions of sections
325.010 to 325.055, may solicit, or enter into, an agreement for the repair or replacement of
damaged property on which said public adjuster or public adjuster solicitor has been engaged
to adjust or settle claims for losses or damages arising out of policies of fire or allied lines of
insurances.
2. No person or entity may:
(1) Acting as a public adjuster, advertise or solicit business by representing they
will or can adjust, negotiate, or settle an insurance claim for which the contractor is
providing or may provide contracting services, regardless of whether the contractor
holds a license under this chapter or is authorized to act on behalf of the insured under a
power of attorney or other agreement; or
(2) Advertise, market, offer, contract, or otherwise represent to unjustifiably
increase or inflate the value of an insurance claim or to waive, absorb, refund, rebate,
pay, or not collect the deductible amount agreed to under or imposed by the terms of the
insurance policy.
3. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Contractor", a person or entity in the business of contracting or offering to
contract with the owner of residential, agricultural, or commercial real estate to repair
or replace roof systems or to erect, demolish, alter, or repair improvements or to

HCS HB 3328 4
perform any other repair, replacement, construction, or reconstruction work on any
residential, agricultural, or commercial structure situated upon residential, agricultural,
or commercial real estate as a general contractor or a subcontractor;
(2) "Negotiate", the process of discussing or exchanging offers with an insurance
company on an insured's behalf to reach an agreement with the insurance company on a
settlement amount for a covered loss;
(3) "Roof system", includes roof coverings, roof sheathing, roof
weatherproofing, and insulation.
4. The director shall adopt rules necessary to implement and enforce this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date,
or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall
be invalid and void.
5. The director is authorized to pursue enforcement actions and order relief as
set forth in sections 374.046 to 374.049.
375.991. 1. As used in sections 375.991 to 375.994, the term "statement" means any
communication, notice statement, proof of loss, bill of lading, receipt for payment, invoice,
account, estimate of damages, bills for services, diagnosis, prescription, hospital or doctor
records, x-rays, test results or other evidence of loss, injury or expense.
2. For the purposes of sections 375.991 to 375.994, a person commits a "fraudulent
insurance act" if such person knowingly presents, causes to be presented, or prepares with
knowledge or belief that it will be presented, to or by an insurer, purported insurer, broker, or
any agent thereof, any oral or written statement including computer generated documents as
part of, or in support of, an application for the issuance of, or the rating of, an insurance
policy for commercial or personal insurance, or a claim for payment or other benefit pursuant
to an insurance policy for commercial or personal insurance, which such person knows to
contain materially false information concerning any fact material thereto or if such person
conceals, for the purpose of misleading another, information concerning any fact material
thereto.
3. A "fraudulent insurance act" shall also include but not be limited to knowingly
filing false insurance claims with an insurer, health services corporation, or health
maintenance organization by engaging in any one or more of the following false billing
practices:

HCS HB 3328 5
(1) "Unbundling", an insurance claim by claiming a number of medical procedures
were performed instead of a single comprehensive procedure;
(2) "Upcoding", an insurance claim by claiming that a more serious or extensive
procedure was performed than was actually performed;
(3) "Exploding", an insurance claim by claiming a series of tests was performed on a
single sample of blood, urine, or other bodily fluid, when actually the series of tests was part
of one battery of tests; [or]
(4) "Duplicating", a medical, hospital or rehabilitative insurance claim made by a
health care provider by resubmitting the claim through another health care provider in which
the original health care provider has an ownership interest; or
(5) "Inflating", the intentional overstatement of the reasonable cost of goods or
services or exaggeration of the extent of damage, injury, or loss by an insured,
contractor, health care provider, or other service provider to increase the amount of an
insurance claim payment or to offset the amount of the deductible the insured would
otherwise be responsible for under the terms of the policy.

Nothing in sections 375.991 to 375.994 shall prohibit health care providers from making
good faith efforts to ensure that claims for reimbursement are coded to reflect the proper
diagnosis and treatment.
4. If, by its own inquiries or as a result of complaints, the department of commerce
and insurance has reason to believe that a person has engaged in, or is engaging in, any
fraudulent insurance act or has violated any provision of chapters 375 to 385, it may
administer oaths and affirmations, serve subpoenas ordering the attendance of witnesses or
proffering of matter, [and] collect evidence, and issue an order to cease and desist, or issue
a curative or summary order as set forth under section 374.046. The director may refer
such evidence as is available concerning violations of this chapter to the proper prosecuting
attorney or circuit attorney who may, with or without such reference, initiate the appropriate
criminal proceedings.
5. If the matter that the department of commerce and insurance seeks to obtain by
request is located outside the state, the person so requested may make it available to the
department or its representative to examine the matter at the place where it is located. The
department may designate representatives, including officials of the state in which the matter
is located, to inspect the matter on its behalf, and it may respond to similar requests from
officials of other states.
6. A fraudulent insurance act for a first offense is a class E felony. Any person who is
found guilty of a fraudulent insurance act who has previously been found guilty of a
fraudulent insurance act shall be guilty of a class D felony.

HCS HB 3328 6
7. Any person who pleads guilty or is found guilty of a fraudulent insurance act shall
be ordered by the court to make restitution to any person or insurer for any financial loss
sustained as a result of such violation. The court shall determine the extent and method of
restitution.
8. Nothing in this section shall limit the power of the state to punish any person for
any conduct that constitutes a crime by any other state statute.
379.135. 1. Upon payment by an insurer of all or any part of a claimant's
property damage claim, legal title to the portion of the claim paid shall vest in the
insurer to the extent of such payment. No assignment or other action by the claimant
shall be required for the insurer to enforce its legal title. The claimant shall retain legal
title only to that portion of the property damage claim not paid by the insurer.
2. As used in this section, "assignment agreement" means any instrument by
which post-loss benefits under any policy of insurance covering property including, but
not limited to, any right of action against the insurer or any proceeds acquired from the
insurer are assigned, transferred, or acquired in any other manner, in whole or in part,
to or from a person providing services including, but not limited to, communicating with
an insurer or on an insured's behalf or inspecting, estimating, protecting, repairing,
restoring, or replacing the property or mitigating against further damage to the
property.
3. (1) A person shall not solicit or accept an assignment, in whole or in part, of
any post-loss insurance benefit for a property damage under a contract of insurance.
An assignment agreement is against public policy, is null and void, and any contract
entered into in violation of this section shall be void and unenforceable; and
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to:
(a) An assignment, transfer, pledge, or conveyance granted to a financial
institution, mortgagee, lienholder, or a subsequent purchaser of the property; and
(b) Any covenant not to execute or contract to limit recovery under section
537.065.
4. A violation of subsection 3 of this section shall not apply to any covenant not to
execute or contract to limit recovery under section 537.065.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an insured from
authorizing or directing payment to, or paying a person for services, materials, or any
other thing which may be, or is, covered under an insurance policy. Insurers shall issue
payment directly to a person for services, materials, and other items that are covered
under an insurance policy, when the insured agrees that any person providing such
services should be paid directly, subject to applicable liens.

HCS HB 3328 7
379.162. 1. This section shall apply to all homeowners' policies issued,
continued, or renewed on or after July 1, 2027.
2. As used in this section, the following words and terms shall mean:
(1) "Homeowner's policy", a homeowner's insurance policy, a dwelling-owner's
insurance policy, or a residential fire insurance policy covering real property within this
state. For purposes of this section, this term shall not include a manufactured home or
mobile homeowner's policy, a tenant's or renter's policy, or a condo owner's policy;
(2) "Insurer", all insurance companies, reciprocals, interinsurance exchanges
licensed under chapters 379 and 380, and the property insurance inspection and
placement program (the "FAIR" Plan), issuing and renewing residential property
insurance policies;
(3) "Qualified inspector", a person who is:
(a) A roofing inspector that is accredited by the National Roof Certification and
Inspection Association (NRCIA) or a nationally recognized equivalent;
(b) A professional engineer or architect licensed under chapter 327;
(c) A roofing contractor who has been in the roofing business for not less than
ten years and who has evidence of the following:
a. A business registration with the Missouri secretary of state;
b. A valid Missouri sales tax number; and
c. Possesses a local contractor's license, where required by a local municipality
or county; or
(d) Any other individual or entity recognized by the insurer as possessing the
necessary qualifications to properly complete a general inspection of the roof of a
residential structure insured under a homeowner's policy.
3. An insurer may not refuse to issue, cancel, or nonrenew a homeowner's policy
insuring a residential structure with a roof that is less than fifteen years old solely
because of the age of the roof.
4. For a roof that is fifteen years of age or older, an insurer shall allow a
homeowner to have a roof inspection performed by a qualified inspector at the
homeowner's expense before requiring the replacement of the roof of a residential
structure as a condition of issuing, continuing, or renewing a homeowner's policy.
5. The insurer shall not refuse to issue, cancel, or refuse to renew a homeowner's
policy solely because of the roof's age if an inspection of the roof of the residential
structure performed by a qualified inspector indicates that the roof has five years or
more of useful life remaining.
6. For purposes of this section, a roof's age shall be calculated using the last date
on which one hundred percent of the roof's surface area was built or replaced or the

HCS HB 3328 8
initial date of a partial roof replacement when subsequent partial roof builds or
replacements were completed that resulted in one hundred percent of the roof's surface
area being built or replaced.
7. This section shall not:
(1) Limit the ability of an insurer to refuse to issue, cancel, or nonrenew any
homeowner's policy on any other grounds, including, but not limited to, that the
structure does not otherwise meet underwriting criteria applicable to replacement cost
or law and ordinance coverage or for other reasons not prohibited under Missouri law.
(2) Prohibit an insurer from limiting its liability under a policy or endorsement
through a deductible or to direct physical loss caused by a covered peril.
8. (1) A policyholder may not assign, in whole or in part, any post-loss insurance
benefit under any residential property insurance policy or under any commercial
property insurance policy issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027.
(2) Any attempt to assign post-loss property insurance benefits under a policy
issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, is void, invalid, and unenforceable.
379.163. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Replacement cost coverage", "replacement cost value", or "RCV", the
coverage that ultimately pays the estimated cost to repair or replace covered property at
the time of the loss or damage without deduction for depreciation. "Replacement cost
value" is not the market value, but it is instead the cost to repair or replace covered
property to its pre-loss condition;
(2) "Residential property insurance policy", a homeowner's insurance, dwelling-
owner's insurance, residential fire insurance, condo owner's insurance, or
manufactured home or mobile homeowner's insurance written upon property within
this state;
(3) "Withheld recoverable depreciation" or "replacement cost holdback", the
portion of an insurance claim payment that an insurer does not pay until the
policyholder completes necessary repairs or replacement of damaged covered property.
Once the repairs or replacements are completed, the policyholder is eligible to receive
the withheld amount subject to the terms of the insurance policy.
2. An insurer that issues a residential property insurance policy with
replacement cost coverage for roof damage may refuse to pay a claim for withheld
recoverable depreciation or a replacement cost holdback under the policy for a roof
claim until the insurer receives reasonable proof of payment by the policyholder of any
deductible applicable to the roof claim.

HCS HB 3328 9
3. Reasonable proof of payment includes a canceled check, money order receipt,
credit card statement, or copy of an executed installment plan contract or other
financing arrangement that requires full payment of the deductible over time.
379.3000. Sections 379.3000 to 379.3055 may be cited as the "Missouri Disaster
Mediation Act".
379.3005. 1. The provisions of sections 379.3000 to 379.3055 provide for a
nonadversarial alternative dispute resolution program for a facilitated claim resolution
process prompted by the critical need for effective, fair, and timely handling of
insurance claims arising out of damage to residential property caused by an event for
which there is a state of disaster declared within sixty days of the event.
2. Sections 379.3000 to 379.3055 shall only apply when the director issues an
order initiating the alternative dispute resolution program authorized under the
Missouri disaster mediation act and:
(1) If a state of emergency has been proclaimed for this state or for an area
within this state by the governor, or by a resolution of the general assembly under
section 44.100; or
(2) If the President of the United States has issued a major disaster declaration
for this state or for an area within this state under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief
and Emergency Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 5121, et seq., as amended.
3. The mediation program under sections 379.3000 to 379.3055 shall be available
to Missouri residents with first-party insurance claims resulting from damage to
residential property that serves as a Missouri resident's primary dwelling located within
this state. Sections 379.3000 to 379.3055 shall not apply to commercial insurance,
property insurance covering multiple family dwellings, motor vehicle insurance, or
liability coverage contained within property insurance policies.
4. After the program has been initiated by order of the director, it shall remain
available to first-party claimants until the director makes a determination that the need
has decreased due to sufficient progress of recovery efforts and issues an order
terminating same.
379.3010. For purposes of sections 379.3000 to 379.3055, except where otherwise
provided, the following terms mean:
(1) "Administrator", the director or the director's designee;
(2) "Director", the director of the department of commerce and insurance;
(3) "Disputed claim", any matter on which there is a dispute as to the cause of
loss or amount of loss under a residential property insurance policy, for which the
insurer has denied payment, in part or whole, with respect to claims arising from a
disaster. Unless the parties agree to mediate a disputed claim involving a lesser amount,

HCS HB 3328 10
a "disputed claim" involves the insured requesting one thousand five hundred dollars or
more to settle the dispute, or the difference between the positions of the parties is one
thousand five hundred dollars or more. "Disputed claim" does not include a dispute
with respect to which the insurer has reported allegations of fraud, based on a referral
by the insurer's special investigative unit, to the director. A disputed claim does not
include the following:
(a) A dispute with respect to which the insurer has reported allegations of fraud,
based on a referral by the insurer's special investigative unit, to the director; or
(b) A dispute in which there has been a denial of coverage for the loss because of
exclusions in the residential property insurance policy, terms in the policy, conditions in
the policy, or if coverage was not in force at the time of the loss;
(4) "Insured", the named insured under a residential property insurance policy;
(5) "Insurer", all insurance companies, reciprocals, interinsurance exchanges
licensed under chapters 379 and 380, and including Lloyds insurers, surplus lines
insurers, and the property insurance inspection and placement program (the "FAIR"
Plan), issuing and renewing residential property insurance policies;
(6) "Mediation", the alternative dispute resolution program established under
sections 379.3000 to 379.3055; an informal process conducted or overseen by a mediator
with the objective of helping parties voluntarily settle a disputed claim;
(7) "Mediator", a neutral person who acts to encourage and facilitate the
resolution of a disputed claim. A mediator shall not make an award or render a
judgment as to the merits of the claim. A mediator shall not impose the mediator's
judgment on the issues for that of the parties;
(8) "Party or parties", the insured and the insurer;
(9) "Residential property insurance policy or policies", a homeowner's
insurance, dwelling-owner's insurance, residential fire insurance, condo owner's
insurance, manufactured home or mobile homeowner's insurance, tenant's or renter's
insurance, or any other contract of insurance covering owner-occupied single-family
habitational property.
379.3015. 1. Insurers shall notify their insureds in this state who have claimed
damage to their residential properties because of a disaster of their right to mediate
disputed claims. This requirement applies to all disputed claims, including instances
where partial or full payment has been issued by the insurer to the insured.
2. The insurer shall, by mail or electronic mail, transmit the notice described in
this section to an insured within five days after the time the insured or the administrator
notifies the insurer of a dispute regarding the insured's claim. The following conditions
apply:

HCS HB 3328 11
(1) If the insurer has not been notified of a disputed claim before the time an
insurer notifies the insured that a claim has been denied in whole or in part, the insurer
shall mail a notice of the right to mediate to the insured in the same mailing as the notice
of denial;
(2) The insurer is not required to send a notice of the right to mediate if a claim
is denied because the amount of the claim is less than the insured's deductible;
(3) The transmission that contains the notice of the right to mediate shall include
any consumer brochure on mediation developed by the director; and
(4) Notification shall be in writing and shall be legible, conspicuous, and printed
in at least twelve-point type. The first paragraph of the notice shall contain the
following statement:
"THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MISSOURI HAS ENACTED A
LAW TO FACILITATE FAIR AND TIMELY HANDLING OF
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY INSURANCE CLAIMS ARISING
OUT OF CATASTROPHIC WEATHER EVENTS. THIS LAW
GIVES YOU THE RIGHT TO ATTEND A MEDIATION
CONFERENCE WITH YOUR INSURANCE COMPANY TO
SETTLE ANY DISPUTE YOU HAVE ABOUT YOUR INSURANCE
CLAIM. AN INDEPENDENT MEDIATOR, WHO HAS NO
CONNECTION WITH YOUR INSURANCE COMPANY, WILL BE
IN CHARGE OF THE MEDIATION CONFERENCE. THERE IS
NO COST TO YOU FOR USING THIS MEDIATION PROCESS.
YOU DO NOT NEED TO HIRE A PUBLIC ADJUSTER OR AN
ATTORNEY TO USE THE MEDIATION PROCESS. IF YOU
HAVE A PUBLIC ADJUSTER OR AN ATTORNEY, YOU WILL
HAVE TO PAY THOSE COSTS.".
3. The notice shall also include the following:
(1) Detailed instructions on how the insured is to request mediation, including
the name, address, telephone number, and website address for requesting a mediation
with the administrator;
(2) The insurer's address and telephone number for requesting additional
information; and
(3) The state from which the administrator shall select the mediator.
379.3020. 1. If an insured requests mediation before receipt of the notice of the
right to mediate or if the date of the notice cannot be established, the insurer shall be
notified by the administrator of the existence of the dispute before the administrator

HCS HB 3328 12
processes the insured's request for mediation. An insured must request mediation
within sixty days after the denial of the claim.
2. The failure to request mediation within this time period shall only bar the
right to demand mediation. It shall not prejudice any other legal right or remedy of the
insured nor shall it prohibit the insurer from voluntarily accepting the request for
mediation.
3. If an insurer receives a request for mediation, the insurer shall electronically
transmit the request to the administrator within three business days after receipt of the
request. If the director receives any request, it shall electronically transmit those
requests to the administrator within three business days after receipt. The
administrator shall notify the insurer within three business days after receipt of a
request that has been filed with the director.
4. In the insured's request for mediation, the insured shall provide the following
information, if known:
(1) Name, address, and daytime telephone number of the insured and location of
the property if different from the address given;
(2) The claim and policy number for the insured;
(3) A brief description of the nature of the dispute; and
(4) The name of the insurer and the name, address, and phone number of the
contact person for scheduling mediation.
379.3025. 1. The director may contract with qualified administrators to oversee
the mediation program by means of a formal bid process. A qualified administrator
may also be selected by the director without a formal bid process if a state of emergency
has been declared pursuant to section 44.100. All bid processes must comply with either
sections 34.040 or 34.045.
2. The expenses and fees of the mediator and of the administrator as established
by the director are borne by the insurer. All other mediation costs, fees, or expenses
shall be borne by the party incurring such costs, fees, or expenses unless otherwise
provided in a settlement agreement.
3. The director shall establish fee schedules for moneys to be paid directly to the
administrator by the insurer for the services of the administrator, the mediator, and for
timely and untimely mediation cancellations. Fee schedules shall be established through
promulgation of emergency rules to be in effect no later than January 1, 2027. Such
rules establishing fee schedules may be amended as necessary, including as specified by
section 536.025 if a state of emergency has been declared pursuant to section 44.100.
4. The director, the administrator, and mediators appointed by the director shall
have such official immunity pursuant to section 537.600 and as exists at common law.

HCS HB 3328 13
379.3030. 1. The administrator shall select a mediator and schedule the
mediation conference.
2. To be approved, the mediator who provides alternative dispute resolution
services independently or through an organization shall have appropriate training or
equivalent experience in conducting the type of alternative dispute resolution service the
individual or organization provides, under Missouri supreme court rule 17.
379.3035. 1. The rules adopted by the director shall include a requirement of the
mediator to advise the parties of the mediation process and their rights and duties in the
mediation process.
2. A mediator shall terminate the mediation conference if the mediator
determines that either party is unable or unwilling to participate meaningfully in the
process or upon mutual agreement of the parties.
3. An insurer's representative attending a mediation conference shall:
(1) Bring, in paper or electronic medium, a copy of the policy and the entire
claims file to the conference; and
(2) Know the facts and circumstances of the claim and be knowledgeable of the
provisions of the policy.
4. An insurer shall be deemed to have failed to appear if the insurer's
representative lacks authority to settle the claim within the limits of the policy.
5. The mediator shall be in charge of the mediation conference and shall
establish and describe the procedures to be followed.
6. A party may move to disqualify a mediator for good cause prior to the
conference. If the grounds for disqualification are known before the mediation
conference, the request to disqualify a mediator shall be directed to the administrator.
For purposes of this section, good cause consists of a conflict of interest between a party
and the mediator, the inability of the mediator to handle the mediation conference
competently, or other reasons that would reasonably be expected to impair the
mediation conference.
379.3040. 1. Within five business days after the conclusion of the mediation
conference, the mediator shall file with the administrator a mediator's status report, on
a form prescribed by the administrator, indicating whether or not the parties reached a
settlement.
2. Mediation is nonbinding unless all the parties specifically agree otherwise in
writing.
3. If the parties reach a settlement, the mediator shall include a copy of the
settlement agreement with the status report.

HCS HB 3328 14
4. Within five business days after the conclusion of the mediation, if agreed to by
the parties, the insurer shall disburse the settlement funds in accordance with the terms
of the settlement agreement. The insured has three business days after receipt of the
settlement funds within which to notify the director and the insurer of the insured's
decision to rescind the settlement agreement. The rescission shall only be valid if the
insured has not received the settlement funds by electronic means or has not cashed or
deposited any check or draft disbursed to the insured in payment of the settlement
funds.
5. If a settlement agreement is reached, and is not rescinded, it shall act as a
release of all specific claims that were presented in the mediation conference. Any
subsequent claim under the policy shall be presented as a separate claim.
379.3042. If the insured decides not to participate in the mediation program or if
the parties are unsuccessful at resolving the claim, the insured may choose to proceed
under the appraisal process set forth in the insurance policy, by litigation, or by any
other dispute resolution procedure available under Missouri law.
379.3045. If the insured rescinds a settlement agreement in accordance with
sections 379.3000 to 379.3055, the director may review the settlement agreement to
determine if the agreement was fair to the parties to the agreement. If the director, after
completing a review and within ten business days after receiving notice of the rescission,
deems that the settlement agreement was fair to the parties, the insured, upon notice
from the director, may withdraw the rescission within five business days after receipt of
the order from the director, and the settlement agreement is reinstated as if no rescission
had taken place. The director's review and findings shall not be offered or accepted as
evidence in any subsequent proceedings brought under sections 379.3000 to 379.3055.
379.3050. 1. All statements made and documents produced at a mediation
conference shall be deemed confidential settlement communications.
2. All documents and records produced or exchanged prior to or during the
mediation conference shall be considered closed records under chapter 610. These
documents and records shall not be subject to subpoena.
3. No person who serves as administrator or mediator, nor any agent or
employee of that person, shall be subpoenaed or otherwise compelled to disclose any
matter disclosed in the process of setting up or conducting the mediation.
4. Any communication relating to the dispute made during the resolution
process by any party, the administrator, mediator, or any other person present at the
mediation shall be a confidential communication. No admission, representation,
statement, or other confidential communication made in setting up or conducting the

HCS HB 3328 15
mediation conference not otherwise discoverable or obtainable shall be admissible as
evidence nor shall it be subject to discovery.
5. If the director or an employee or designee of the director attends a mediation
proceeding, the director, employee, or designee shall not be compelled to testify about
what transpired at the mediation or about any other matter in connection with the
mediation.
379.3055. 1. The director shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations
for the administration of sections 379.3000 to 379.3055. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. The director shall establish emergency rules and proposed rules including, but
not limited to, the following:
(1) Fee schedules for the payment of moneys;
(2) The conduct of mediation conferences where the rule is not in conflict with
Missouri supreme court rule 17;
(3) A mediator advising the parties of the mediation process and the parties'
rights and duties in the process; and
(4) Any other rule that the director believes is required for the implementation
of the mediation program.
3. The rules implemented under this section may be amended as necessary,
including emergency rules promulgated under section 536.025, if a state of emergency
has been declared under section 44.100.
4. Sections 379.3000 to 379.3055 shall become effective on January 1, 2027, and
expire June 30, 2038.
379.3100. Sections 379.3100 to 379.3140 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Stronger Homes Act".
379.3105. For purposes of sections 379.3100 to 379.3140, except where otherwise
provided, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of commerce and insurance;
(2) "Director", the director of the department;
(3) "Eligible property", a residential, single-family, owner-occupied real
property within this state;

HCS HB 3328 16
(4) "Homeowner's policy", a homeowner's insurance policy, a dwelling owner's
insurance policy, or a residential fire insurance policy covering real property within this
state. "Homeowner's policy" shall not include a mobile homeowner's policy, a tenant's
or renter's policy, or a condo owner's policy;
(5) "Insured", the named insured under a residential property insurance policy;
(6) "Insurer", all insurance companies, reciprocals, and interinsurance
exchanges licensed under chapters 379 and 380, and the property insurance
inspection and placement program (the "FAIR" Plan), issuing and renewing
residential property insurance policies;
(7) "Program", the Missouri stronger homes program created under section
379.3110;
(8) "Residential property owner", any individual person who holds legal title to
real property that has been improved by a dwelling structure intended for residential,
single-family occupancy;
(9) "Risk reduction standards", guidelines and technical specifications designed
to minimize the likelihood or impact of wind and hail weather events. "Risk reduction
standards" include, but are not limited to, the use of designated construction materials
and products which demonstrate enhanced resistance to wind or hail, in addition to the
utilization of certain design, engineering, inspection, installation methods, and other
maintenance protocols necessary to ensure the proper performance of materials and
products.
379.3110. 1. There is hereby created within the department the "Missouri
Stronger Homes Program".
2. Sections 379.3100 to 379.3140 do not create an entitlement for property
owners or obligate this state to fund the inspection, construction, or retrofitting of
residential property in this state.
3. Grant moneys shall be provided under sections 379.3100 to 379.3140 to assist
Missouri residents in retrofitting and constructing eligible properties to resist loss due to
tornado, other catastrophic windstorm events, or hail.
4. Implementation of the program is subject to the receipt of federal grants or
funds from other sources of grants or funds, including those funds specified in section
379.3115. The department shall use its best efforts to obtain grants or funds from the
federal government or other funding sources to supplement the financial resources of
the program.
5. The program shall apply for financial grants to construct or retrofit eligible
property to resist damage due to a tornado, other catastrophic windstorm events, or hail
as prescribed in section 379.3135.

HCS HB 3328 17
6. The program may also make grants or funding available to nonprofit entities
for projects to construct or retrofit eligible properties to resist loss due to tornado, other
catastrophic windstorm events, or hail if such grants or funding to nonprofit entities are
allowable under Missouri law. A nonprofit entity shall agree to administer the grants or
funds in the same manner as the program is required to administer grants or funds, and
the nonprofit entity shall provide documentation to the director in a timely manner
upon request.
7. All mitigation efforts shall be based upon the securing of all required local
permits and applicable inspections in keeping with local building codes and the risk
reduction standards of this program. Mitigation projects are subject to random
reinspection of all projects.
8. The director shall establish a maximum grant award amount by rule and
adjust such amount as necessary to reflect changes in construction costs. The maximum
amount of any grant awarded to an individual residential property owner shall not
exceed fifteen thousand dollars.
379.3115. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri Stronger
Homes Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated or collected under this
section.
2. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and
shall consist of any moneys deposited to the fund from the receipt of federal grants or
funds, or from other sources of grants or funds. All moneys accruing to the credit of the
fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the department of
commerce and insurance for the purpose of assisting the Missouri stronger homes
program in performing all duties that relate to the program under sections 379.3100 to
379.3140. Expenditures from the fund shall be drawn by the state treasurer, based on
claims submitted by the department, and filed with the office of administration.
3. Moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the fund. Moneys in
this fund shall not lapse unless otherwise specified under federal funding or federal
grant, or a grant or funds from another source, or be transferred to the insurance
examination fund or general revenue and shall not be redistributed.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, twelve million
dollars shall be transferred from the insurance dedicated fund established under section
374.150 and placed to the credit of the Missouri stronger homes fund on July 1, 2027.
Beginning July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter until July 1, 2037, up to twenty percent
of the remaining balance in the insurance dedicated fund as of June thirtieth of the
preceding fiscal year, in an amount not to exceed two million dollars in any one year,
shall be transferred to and placed to the credit of the Missouri stronger homes fund.

HCS HB 3328 18
5. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund and shall approve
disbursements from the fund in accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180. Upon
appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used solely for the purposes of this
section. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other
funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
6. The provisions of this section shall expire on June 30, 2038.
7. Any moneys remaining in the Missouri stronger homes fund at the expiration
of the program on July 1, 2038, shall revert and be transferred back to the insurance
dedicated fund established under section 374.150.
379.3120. 1. To be eligible for a grant under the Missouri stronger homes
program, residential property owners applying for a grant shall meet the eligibility
requirements set forth by the director by rule for each grant type. The requirements
shall include, but are not limited to, the following:
(1) The eligible property shall be located within this state and shall be the
primary residence of the applicant, or, if new construction, the construction shall be
located within this state and the applicant shall provide other documentation to
demonstrate qualification for the grant, as specified by rules promulgated by the
director;
(2) The eligible property to be mitigated shall be an owner-occupied, single-
family, primary residence and cannot be a condominium, multifamily dwelling, or a
mobile home;
(3) The eligible property shall be in a livable condition, safe for habitation or use,
and otherwise eligible for a certificate of residential occupancy, unless damaged by a
tornado, other catastrophic windstorm event, or hail;
(4) The grant funds cannot be used for general maintenance or repairs to the
eligible property, but may be used in conjunction with repairs or reconstruction
necessitated by damages from a tornado or other catastrophic windstorm event or hail;
(5) A certified evaluator shall prequalify the eligible property as mitigable and
identify all improvements required to achieve the risk reduction standards approved by
the director. The residential property owner shall select the evaluator from a list
provided by the director and shall pay the evaluator's fee;
(6) The residential property owner shall obtain bids from at least three certified
contractors approved by the director;
(7) The residential property owner shall construct or retrofit the home to the
standard approved by the director;

HCS HB 3328 19
(8) The residential property owner shall provide proof of an active, in-force
homeowner's policy insuring against wind and hail damage to the home, unless good
cause is demonstrated by the applicant; and
(9) If the eligible property is in a special flood hazard area, the residential
property owner shall provide proof of an in-force flood insurance policy. The flood
policy may be from the National Flood Insurance Program (NFIP) or a private insurer.
2. Grant applications shall be filed electronically with the department in the
form and manner prescribed by the director, along with any applicable transaction fees.
3. Grant applications and documents, materials, and other information
submitted to the department by residential property owners or insurers in support of
a grant application shall be closed records under chapter 610. These records shall not
be subject to open records requests, subpoenas, and shall not be subject to discovery or
be admissible as evidence in any private civil action. The director is authorized to use
the documents, materials, or other information in furtherance of any regulatory or legal
action brought as a part of the director's duties.
4. Grants to residential property owners shall be used to construct or retrofit an
eligible property to resist loss due to a tornado or other catastrophic windstorm event or
hail as prescribed in the risk reduction standards adopted by the director.
5. Retrofit projects should be completed within six months of the date the
residential property owner receives notice of the grant approval. New construction shall
be completed within the time frame approved by the director. Failure to complete the
project within the prescribed time frames may result in forfeiture of the grant.
6. Grant funds shall only be paid after a certificate has been issued for the
eligible property meeting the risk reduction standard approved by the director. Grant
funds shall be paid by the department or another designated agency, on behalf of the
residential property owner, directly to the contractor who performed the mitigation
work.
7. Applications shall be accepted on a first-come, first-served basis within each
income tier established by the director, with priority given to lower-income applicants,
applicants who live in locations that, based on historical data, have a higher
susceptibility to catastrophic weather events, and applicants meeting any other
criteria the director determines are appropriate to meet the purpose of the program.
8. Any entity providing funds to the program shall be permitted to establish
additional rules and guidelines under which those funds may be used, as long as such
rules and guidelines do not violate any state or federal law.
9. The department may conduct random inspections of funds, records, and
properties to detect any fraud.

HCS HB 3328 20
379.3125. 1. A residential property owner shall hire a certified contractor who is
capable of performing work that satisfies the standards prescribed by this act and the
rules adopted thereto.
2. The department shall not endorse or otherwise provide preferential treatment
to any contractor.
3. A residential property owner is responsible for any amount owed to a
contractor that exceeds awarded grant moneys.
4. To be eligible to work on a project funded by the stronger homes program as a
contractor, a contractor shall meet all requirements including, but not limited to,
maintaining a current copy of all applicable certificates, licenses, and proof of insurance
coverages with the department. In addition, a contractor shall:
(1) If required under Missouri law, hold a valid and active contractor's license or
registration in Missouri and be free from all disciplinary action by any applicable
licensing board or boards;
(2) Be registered to do business in Missouri with the secretary of state;
(3) Have a valid state tax identification number in this state;
(4) Have an in-force general liability policy with at least five hundred thousand
dollars in liability coverage;
(5) Have workers' compensation and employer's liability insurance in
accordance with chapter 287;
(6) Successfully register as a vendor or supplier with the office of
administration;
(7) Maintain accurate contact information with the Missouri stronger homes
program;
(8) Agree to follow all procedures and rules as prescribed by the director;
(9) Not have a financial interest in any project funded by the Missouri stronger
homes program for which the contractor performs work other than receiving payment
on behalf of the residential property owner from the program and shall report to the
program any potential conflicts of interest before work commences;
(10) Not be an evaluator for any project funded by the program; and
(11) Any other requirements as specified by the director by rule.
379.3130. To be eligible to work on a project funded by the stronger homes
program as an evaluator, the evaluator shall meet all requirements including, but not
limited to, the following:
(1) Maintaining a current copy of all applicable certificates and licenses with the
program office;

HCS HB 3328 21
(2) Agreeing to follow the program's procedures and rules as prescribed by the
director;
(3) Maintaining accurate contact information with the program;
(4) Not having any financial interest in any project that the evaluator inspects
for designation purposes for the stronger homes program;
(5) Not being a contractor or supplier of any materials or products or systems
installed in any home the evaluator inspects for designation purposes for the stronger
homes program;
(6) Not being a sales agent or realtor for any home being designated for the
stronger homes program;
(7) Informing the program of any potential conflicts of interest; and
(8) Any other requirements as specified by the director by rule.
379.3135. 1. For homeowner's insurance policies issued, continued, or renewed
on or after January 1, 2027, insurers shall provide a premium discount or insurance
rate reduction in an amount and manner as specified in this section.
2. A premium discount or rate reduction shall be available under the terms
specified in this section to any insured who retrofits the eligible property located in this
state to resist loss due to tornado, other catastrophic windstorm events, or hail.
3. Insurers shall be required to offer a premium discount or rate reduction only
when the insurer has deemed the adjustments to be actuarially justified and there is
sufficient and credible evidence of cost savings, which can be attributed to the
construction standards set forth in this section.
4. Insurers may also offer additional adjustments in deductible, other risk
differentials, or a combination thereof, collectively referred to as other adjustments. To
obtain the premium discount, rate reduction, or other adjustment provided in this
section, an eligible property shall be retrofitted to the risk reduction standards adopted
by the director. An eligible property shall be certified as conforming to the risk
reduction standards only after evaluation and certification by an evaluator as specified
in section 379.3130.
5. An insured claiming a premium discount, rate reduction, or other adjustment
under this section shall maintain sufficient certification records and construction
records for the eligible property, including, but not limited to, a certification of
compliance with the risk reduction standards adopted by the director, receipts from
contractors, and receipts for materials. Copies of the certification and construction
records shall be presented to the insurer or potential insurer of an eligible property
before the premium discount, rate reduction, or other adjustment becomes effective for
the eligible property.

HCS HB 3328 22
6. Insurers that write homeowner's insurance policies that are subject to the
premium discount or rate reduction in this section shall submit rating plans under
section 379.321, accompanied by actuarial justification substantiating the premium
discounts or rate reductions described in this section. A premium discount, rate
reduction, or other adjustment shall apply only to policies that provide wind or hail
coverage. A premium discount, rate reduction, or other adjustment shall apply only to
the premium representative of wind or hail damage to eligible property.
7. If an insurer already offers an actuarially justified hail resistance discount,
that hail-related discount shall be deemed as having met the requirements of sections
379.3100 to 379.3140 as it pertains to hail-related discounts or rate reductions and no
additional hail-related discount or rate reduction shall be required.
8. If an insurer already offers an actuarially justified discount for meeting risk
reduction standards, that discount shall be deemed as having met the requirements of
this act as it pertains to wind-related discounts or rate reductions and no additional
wind-related discount or rate reduction shall be required.
9. Insurers shall apply the premium discount, rate reduction, or other
adjustment to the premium at the policy renewal that follows the submission of the
certification to the insurer. At the time of a policy renewal for which a premium
discount, rate reduction, or other adjustment has previously been made, the insurer
may request documentation or recertification that the risk reduction standards as
described in this section continue to be met.
10. In addition to the requirements of this section, an insurer may voluntarily
offer any other mitigation adjustments that the insurer deems appropriate.
379.3140. 1. The director may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations
for the administration of sections 379.3100 to 379.3140, including, but not limited to,
establishing the risk reduction standards, specifying instructions or requirements on
grants and funds received by the department and establishing other requirements
relating to eligibility and certifications. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. Sections 379.3100 to 379.3140 shall expire on June 30, 2038.

HCS HB 3328 23
380.661. Any company operating under the provisions of sections 380.011 to
380.151 and sections 380.201 to 380.611 shall comply with the provisions of sections
379.3000 to 379.3055.
380.671. 1. Any company operating under the provisions of sections 380.011 to
380.151 and sections 380.201 to 380.611 may develop programs eligible for financial
grants under the provisions of sections 379.3100 to 379.3140.
2. Any company operating under the provisions of sections 380.011 to 380.151
and sections 380.201 to 380.611 shall not be required to submit rating plans under
section 379.321, or otherwise submit actuarial justifications substantiating any discount
or rate associated with the program described in sections 379.3100 to 379.3140.
✔